North Dakota statutes. TITLE 55 State Historical Society and State Parks
CHAPTER 55-04 Acquiring Lands for Public Parks

55-04-01.
Authority of state or county to acquire title to lands for park purposes.

The state, and each county of the state, is authorized to acquire by purchase, exchange, gift, condemnation, or otherwise the title to any lands or to lease any lands within the same political subdivision for the purpose of establishing a public park or recreational area or for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and operating any water or wildlife conservation project.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 214, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 55-0401; S.L. 1989, ch. 145, § 7.

Cross-References.

Eminent domain, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-15.

Municipal parks and park districts, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-49.

Township parks, see N.D.C.C. ch. 58-17.

55-04-02.
Appraisal of lands — Price may not exceed appraised value.

All lands to be purchased or exchanged under authority of this chapter must be appraised by the existing appraisal agencies of the parties to the contract and in all cases when there are no such appraisal agencies the board of county commissioners shall determine the value thereof. In no case may lands be purchased for more than their appraised value, nor may any lands owned by the state or the several counties be exchanged except for lands of an equal appraised value.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 214, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 55-0402.

55-04-03.
Mineral rights to be reserved.

The state of North Dakota shall reserve all mineral rights to all state lands exchanged by it under authority of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 214, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 55-0403.

Cross-References.

Reservations may be released to United States, see N.D.C.C. § 38-09-01.2.